District of Columbia statutes.
2-1215.01

Findings and purpose.

(a)

The Council finds that:

(1)

Business Improvement Districts will help the District to promote economic growth and employment downtown and in other areas of the District;

(2)

Property owners should be encouraged to create BIDs and BID corporations to enhance their local business climate;

(3)

BID corporations should be given flexibility in establishing the self-help programs most consistent with their local needs, goals and objectives; and

(4)

Because additional services and improvements attendant to a BID will provide direct benefits to the real property within a BID, the most equitable method of financing such services is to levy an additional real property tax against all taxable properties within a BID District.

(b)

The purpose of this subchapter is to provide for the creation of Business Improvement Districts the activities of which will promote the general welfare of the residents, employers, employees, property owners, commercial tenants, consumers, and the general public within a BID’s geographic area by preserving, maintaining, and enhancing the economic health and vitality of a BID area as a community and business center.

History

May 29, 1996, D.C. Law 11-134, § 2, 43 DCR 1684
as added Oct. 8, 1997, D.C. Law 12-26, § 2, 44 DCR 4320
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-161, § 2(a), 61 DCR 10741

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-1141.03a.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2271.

Effect of Amendments

The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-161 substituted “taxable” for “nonexempt” in (a)(4).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-23, September 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 5762).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of subchapter, see § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-89, June 19, 1997, 44 DCR 3747), and § 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-146, August 12, 1997, 44 DCR 5054).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Business Improvement Districts Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-435, Oct. 7, 2014, 61 DCR 10717, 20 STAT 4154).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Business Improvement Districts Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-582, Jan. 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1269, 21 STAT 735). The enactment of D.C. Law 12-26 negated the expiration clause of D.C. Law 11-134

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 11-134

Section 24(b) of D.C. Law 11-134 provided that the act shall expire 20 years after its effective date. D.C. Law 11-134 was effective May 29, 1996.

The enactment of D.C. Law 12-26 negated the expiration clause of D.C. Law 11-134.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 11-134, the “Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-47, March 8, 2002 ( 49 DCR 2254).

Mayor's Orders

Amendment to Mayor’s Order 99-33, Registration of the Georgetown Business Improvement District pursuant to D.C. Law 11-134, the “Business Improvement Districts Amending Act of 1996, as amended”, see Mayor’s Order 99-78, May 12, 1999 ( 46 DCR 5435).

Registration of the Capitol Hill North Addition to the Downtown DC Business Improvement District, see Mayor’s Order 2002-46 March 8, 2002 ( 49 DCR 2253).

Extension of the Term of the Downtown DC Business Improvement District Pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, Effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code sec. 2-1215 et seq.), see Mayor’s Order 2002-138, August 16, 2002 ( 49 DCR 7955).

Registration of the NoMa Business Improvement District (“NoMa BID”) and the NoMa Improvement Association, Inc., pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code §§ 2-1215.01 et seq. (2006 Supp.), see Mayor’s Order 2007-105, May 3, 2007 ( 54 DCR 9041).

Extension of the Term of the Downtown DC Business Improvement District Pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-12151.01 et seq.), see Mayor’s Order 2007-173, July 26, 2007 ( 54 DCR 11603).

Extension of the Term of the Capitol Hill Improvement District Pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-12151.01 et seq.), see Mayor’s Order 2007-187, August 15, 2007 ( 54 DCR 11624).

Extension of the Term of the Golden Triangle Business Improvement District, see Mayor’s Order 2008-124, September 4, 2008 ( 55 DCR 11202).

Extension of the Term of the Mount Vernon Triangle Community Improvement District Pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective March 17, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-257; D.C. Official Code §§ 2-1215.01 et seq.), see Mayor’s Order 2009-169, September 30, 2009 ( 56 DCR 8102).

Extension of the Term of the Georgetown Business Improvement District Pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective March 17, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-257; D.C. Official Code §§ 2-1215.01 et seq.), see Mayor’s Order 2009-170, September 30, 2009 ( 56 DCR 8103).

Extension of the Term of the Adams Morgan Partnership Business Improvement District Pursuant to the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective March 17, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-257; D.C. Official Code §§ 2-1215.01 et seq.), see Mayor’s Order 2011-158, September 20, 2011 ( 58 DCR 8412).